Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-557
Taxes; levy; political subdivisions; exemption.

All property of whatever kind and nature owned by the state and by villages, cities, school districts, drainage districts, irrigation districts, park districts, water districts, or any other governmental agency or agencies within the said reclamation district, shall be exempt from assessment and levy by the board as provided by sections 46-501 to 46-573 for the purposes herein contained.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 23, p. 549.